Massachusetts, session 194th, H1707.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 25 the following section:-
Section 25A. Any person who flees or attempts to elude a police officer while operating a
motor vehicle willfully or with a wanton disregard for the safety of persons or property, shall be
punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars and not more than one thousand dollars or
by imprisonment for not less than six months and not more than two years, or both. A conviction
under this provision shall result in a driver's license suspension by the registry of motor vehicles
for 60 days. For the purposes of this section, willful or wanton disregard for the safety of persons
or property includes, but is not limited to, driving while fleeing or attempting to elude a pursuing
of 2

police officer during which time the driver causes property damage or makes three or more
moving violations.
of 2